nl: Ontwerp oorbel: Kroonluchter; Opklikbaar; Bungelen; Drop; Oor klimmer; Oor manchet; Hoepel; Knuffel; Jas; Oorknopjes; Traan; Doortrek; Andere
ja: イヤリングデザイン: シャンデリア; クリップ式; ぶら下げ式; ドロップ; イヤークライマー; イヤーカフ; フープ; ハギー; ジャケット; スタッド; ティアドロップ; スレッド作成者; その他
fi: Korvakorun suunnittelu: Kattokruunu korvakorut; Klipsikorvakoru; Roikkuva; Pudotus; Kiipijä korvakorut; Korvamansetti; Vanne; Huggie; Jacket; Nasta; Kyynel; Ketju; Muu
cs: Design náušnice: Lustr; Klip; Kývací; Podladění; Had; Ušní manžeta; Obruč; Huggie; Bunda; Knoflík; Slza; Navlékací; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế hoa tai: Đèn treo; Clip-On; Theo; Độ giảm; Khuyên tai dáng dài; Hoa tai; Vòng; Huggie; Áo khoác; Đinh tán; Nhỏ gọn; Máy xỏ chỉ; Khác
it: Disegno dell'orecchino: Lampadario; Chiusura a scatto; Penzolare; Drop; Ear climber; Ear cuff; Cerchio; Huggie; Giacca; Perno; Goccia; Threader; Altro
el: Σχέδιο σε σκουλαρίκι: Πολυέλαιος; Κουμπωτό; Κρεμαστό; Βαρύτητας; Climber; Σκουλαρίκι με κλιπ; Στεφάνι; Καρφωτό; Σακάκι; Μπίλια; Δάκρυ; Κρεμαστό με αλυσίδα; Άλλο
de: Ohrring-Design: Leuchter; Clip-On; Hänger; Drop; Ohrkletterer; Ohrstulpe; Reifen; Huggie; Jacke; Stecker; Träne; Threader; Sonstiges
en: Earring design: Chandelier; Clip-On; Dangle; Drop; Ear climber; Ear cuff; Hoop; Huggie; Jacket; Stud; Teardrop; Threader; Other
tr: Küpe tasarımı: Askılı; Klipsli; Sallanan; Drop; Kulak tırmanıcı; Kulak kelepçesi; Çember; Huggie; Ceket; Çıtçıtlı; Gözyaşı; Dişli; Diğer
ko: 귀걸이 디자인: 샹들리에; 클립온; 매달기; 드롭; 이어 클라이머; 이어커프; 후프; 허기; 재킷; 마개; 티어드롭; 스레더; 기타
sk-SK: Dizajn náušníc: Luster; Klipsne; Visiaci; Kvapka; Náušnice Ear climber; Náušnice Ear Cuff; Obručový; Huggie; Jacket; Stud; Slza; Navliekací; Iné
th: การออกแบบต่างหู: ทรงระย้า; แบบคลิปออน; แบบห้อย; ดรอปสาย; แบบ Ear Climber; ต่างหูแบบหนีบ; ห่วง; ทรง Huggie; ทรง Jacket; ทรง Stud; หยดน้ำตา; แบบปลายเข็มห้อย; อื่นๆ
pl: Konstrukcja kolczyka: Żyrandol; Na klips; Wiszące; Spadek; Wspinaczka; Opaska na ucho; Obręcz; Huggie; Jacket; Sztyft; Łza; Nawlekane; Inne
bg-BG: Дизайн на обеца: Полилей; Clip-On; Висулка; Капка; Ear climber; Маншет за ухо; Халка; Huggie; Яке; Stud; Teardrop; Threader; Други
es: Diseño de aretes: Candelabro; Con clip; Largos; Caída; Trepadores; Ear cuff; Aro; Aro pequeño; Jacket; Stud; Lágrima; Enhebrador; Otros
lt-LT: Auskarų dizainas: Kabantys; Prisegamas; Trumpi kabantys; Ploni kabantys; Per visą ausį; Užmaunamas auskaras; Lankai; Su apvaliu segtuku; „Jacket“ tipo auskarai; Prie ausies; Lašo formos; Virvelės; Kita
ru: Дизайн серег: Люстра; Клипса; Подвеска; Капля; Клаймберы; Кафф для ушей; Обруч; Хагги; Футляр; Гвоздик; Капля; Продевка; Другой
zh-CN: 耳环设计: 枝形吊灯式; 夹式; 垂坠式; 降调; 爬耳式; 耳骨夹; 圈环; 抱式; 扇形; 耳钉; 泪滴状; 耳线; 其他
pt-PT: Desenho de brinco: Lustre; Fecho de encaixe; Pendurar; Comprimento da cortina; Brincos ear climber; Protetor de orelha; Aro; Abraço; Jaqueta; Viga; Em forma de lágrima; Enfiador; Outro
fr: Conception de boucle d’oreille: Chandelier; À clipser; Pendante; Diminué; Grimpeur d’oreille; Manchette d’oreille; Cerceau; Huggie; Veste; Solitaire; Mini-caravane; À enfiler; Autre
ro-RO: Design cercel: Candelabru; Clips; Cu pandantiv; Lungi; Ear climber; Ear cuff; Rotunzi; Huggie; Jacket; Cu șurub; Lacrimă; Șnur; Altele
hr-HR: Dizajn naušnica: Chandelier; Kopčanje; Dangle; Kapljica; Penjačice; Manžeta za uho; Obruč; Huggie naušnice; Jacket naušnice; Stud naušnice; Suza; Threader naušnice; Ostalo
da: Øreringedesign: Chandelier; Clip-on; Dingle; Drop; Øreklatrer; Ear cuff; Ring; Huggie; Jakke; Stud; Tåre; Threader; Andet
sv: Design på örhänge: Chandelier; Clip-on; Dingla; Sänkning; Ear climber; Öronmanschett; Ring; Huggie; Jacka; Hingst; Teardrop; Gängare; Övrigt
hu: Fülbevaló kialakítása: Függő; Klipsz; Függő; Csepp alakú; Ear climber; Fülmandzsetta; Gyűrű; Huggie; Jacket; Szegecs; Könnycsepp; Threader; Egyéb
sl-SI: Zasnova uhanov: Lestenec; Pripenjanje; Viseč; Viseči; Ušesna manšeta; Ušesna manšeta za pripenjanje; Obroč; Majhni obročki; Spredaj zadaj; Neviseč; Kaplja; Verižica; Drugo
zh-TW: 耳環設計: 枝形吊燈; 夾式; 懸垂; 下降; 耳掛耳環; 耳骨夾; 環形; 圈式; 扇形; 耳釘; 淚珠; 垂掛; 其他
nb: Øreringdesign: Lysekrone; Clip-On; Dingle; Slipp; Ear climber; Øremansjett; Bøyle; Huggie; Jakke; Stud; Teardrop; Treder; Annet
pt-BR: Design do brinco: Lustre; Clip-On; Pendurar; Queda; Ear climber; Ear cuff; Argola; Argola pequena; Por trás da orelha; Minimalista; Mini-trailer; Threader; Outro